Florida, session 2026, SB7030.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 44 45 Section 1.âPresent subsection (8) of section 501.9984, 46 Florida Statutes, as created by SB 482 or similar legislation, 47 2026 Regular Session, is redesignated as subsection (9), and a 48 new subsection (8) is added to that section, to read: 49 501.9984âCompanion chatbot use for minors.â 50 (8)(a)âAll information held by the department pursuant to a 51 notification of a violation of this section or an investigation 52 of a violation of this section is confidential and exempt from 53 s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution, 54 until such time as the investigation is completed or ceases to 55 be active. This exemption shall be construed in conformity with 56 s. 119.071(2)(c). 57 (b)âDuring an active investigation, information made 58 confidential and exempt pursuant to paragraph (a) may be 59 disclosed by the department: 60 1.âIn the furtherance of its official duties and 61 responsibilities; 62 2.âFor print, publication, or broadcast if the department 63 determines that such release would assist in notifying the 64 public or locating or identifying a person whom the department 65 believes to be a victim of an improper use or disposal of 66 customer records, except that information made confidential and 67 exempt by paragraph (c) may not be released pursuant to this 68 subparagraph; or 69 3.âTo another governmental entity in the furtherance of 70 such entityâs official duties and responsibilities. 71 (c)âUpon completion of an investigation or once an 72 investigation ceases to be active, the following information 73 held by the department shall remain confidential and exempt from 74 s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution: 75 1.âInformation that is otherwise confidential or exempt 76 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 77 Constitution. 78 2.âPersonal identifying information. 79 3.âA computer forensic report. 80 4.âInformation that would otherwise reveal weaknesses in 81 the data security of a companion chatbot platform. 82 5.âInformation that would disclose the proprietary 83 information of a companion chatbot platform. 84 (d)âFor purposes of this section, the term âproprietary 85 informationâ means information that: 86 1.âIs owned or controlled by the companion chatbot 87 platform. 88 2.âIs intended to be private and is treated by the 89 companion chatbot platform as private because disclosure would 90 harm the companion chatbot platform or its business operations. 91 3.âHas not been disclosed except as required by law or a 92 private agreement that provides that the information will not be 93 released to the public. 94 4.âIs not publicly available or otherwise readily 95 ascertainable through proper means from another source in the 96 same configuration as received by the department. 97 5.âReveals competitive interests, the disclosure of which 98 would impair the competitive advantage of the companion chatbot 99 platform that is the subject of the information. 100 (e)âThis subsection is subject to the Open Government 101 Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand 102 repealed on October 2, 2031, unless reviewed and saved from 103 repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 104 Section 2.âThe Legislature finds that it is a public 105 necessity that all information held by the Department of Legal 106 Affairs pursuant to a notification or investigation of a 107 violation of s. 501.9984, Florida Statutes, be made confidential 108 and exempt from s. 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), 109 Article I of the State Constitution for the following reasons: 110 (1)âA notification of a violation of s. 501.9984, Florida 111 Statutes, may result in an investigation of such violation. The 112 premature release of such information could frustrate or thwart 113 the investigation and impair the ability of the department to 114 effectively and efficiently administer s. 501.9984, Florida 115 Statutes. In addition, release of such information before 116 completion of an active investigation could jeopardize the 117 ongoing investigation. 118 (2)âThe release of information that is otherwise 119 confidential or exempt from public records requirements once an 120 investigation is completed or ceases to be active would undo the 121 specific statutory exemption protecting that information, thus 122 affirming that any protections currently afforded to such 123 information are not removed. 124 (3)âAn investigation of a violation of s. 501.9984, Florida 125 Statutes, is likely to result in the gathering of sensitive 126 personal identifying information, which could include 127 identification numbers, unique identifiers, professional or 128 employment-related information, and personal financial 129 information. Such information could be used for the purpose of 130 identity theft. The release of such information could subject 131 families to possible privacy violations, as it would reveal 132 information of a sensitive personal nature. 133 (4)âNotices received by the department and information 134 generated during an investigation of a violation of s. 501.9984, 135 Florida Statutes, are likely to contain proprietary information. 136 Such information derives independent economic value, actual or 137 potential, from being generally unknown to, and not readily 138 ascertainable by, other persons who might obtain economic value 139 from its disclosure or use. Allowing public access to 140 proprietary information through a public records request could 141 destroy the value of the proprietary information and cause a 142 financial loss to the companion chatbot platform. Release of 143 such information could give business competitors an unfair 144 advantage. 145 (5)âInformation held by the department may contain a 146 computer forensic report or information that could reveal 147 weaknesses in the data security of a companion chatbot platform. 148 The release of this information could result in the 149 identification of vulnerabilities in the cybersecurity system of 150 the companion chatbot platform and be used to harm the companion 151 chatbot platform and its clients. 152 (6)âThe harm that may result from the release of 153 information held by the department pursuant to a notification or 154 an investigation of a violation of s. 501.9984, Florida 155 Statutes, could impair the effective and efficient 156 administration of the investigation and thus outweighs the 157 public benefit that may be derived from the disclosure of the 158 information. 159 Section 3.âPresent subsection (5) of section 501.9985, 160 Florida Statutes, as created by SB 482 or similar legislation, 161 2026 Regular Session, is redesignated as subsection (6), and a 162 new subsection (5) is added to that section, to read: 163 501.9985âConsumer protections regarding bots.â 164 (5)(a)âAll information held by the department pursuant to a 165 notification of a violation of this section or an investigation 166 of a violation of this section is confidential and exempt from 167 s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution, 168 until such time as the investigation is completed or ceases to 169 be active. This exemption shall be construed in conformity with 170 s. 119.071(2)(c). 171 (b)âDuring an active investigation, information made 172 confidential and exempt pursuant to paragraph (a) may be 173 disclosed by the department: 174 1.âIn the furtherance of its official duties and 175 responsibilities; 176 2.âFor print, publication, or broadcast if the department 177 determines that such release would assist in notifying the 178 public or locating or identifying a person who the department 179 believes to be a victim of an improper use or disposal of 180 customer records, except that information made confidential and 181 exempt by paragraph (c) may not be released pursuant to this 182 subparagraph; or 183 3.âTo another governmental entity in the furtherance of 184 such entityâs official duties and responsibilities. 185 (c)âUpon completion of an investigation or once an 186 investigation ceases to be active, the following information 187 held by the department shall remain confidential and exempt from 188 s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution: 189 1.âInformation that is otherwise confidential or exempt 190 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 191 Constitution. 192 2.âPersonal identifying information. 193 3.âA computer forensic report. 194 4.âInformation that would otherwise reveal weaknesses in 195 the data security of a bot or an operator of a bot. 196 5.âInformation that would disclose the proprietary 197 information of an operator of a bot. 198 (d)âFor purposes of this section, the term âproprietary 199 informationâ means information that: 200 1.âIs owned or controlled by the operator of a bot. 201 2.âIs intended to be private and is treated by the operator 202 of a bot as private because disclosure would harm the operator 203 of the bot or its business operations. 204 3.âHas not been disclosed except as required by law or a 205 private agreement that provides that the information will not be 206 released to the public. 207 4.âIs not publicly available or otherwise readily 208 ascertainable through proper means from another source in the 209 same configuration as received by the department. 210 5.âReveals competitive interests, the disclosure of which 211 would impair the competitive advantage of the operator of the 212 bot that is the subject of the information. 213 (e)âThis subsection is subject to the Open Government 214 Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand 215 repealed on October 2, 2031, unless reviewed and saved from 216 repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 217 Section 4.âThe Legislature finds that it is a public 218 necessity that all information held by the Department of Legal 219 Affairs pursuant to a notification of a violation of s. 220 501.9985, Florida Statutes, or an investigation of a violation 221 of that section, be made confidential and exempt from s. 222 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of the 223 State Constitution for the following reasons: 224 (1)âA notification of a violation of s. 501.9985, Florida 225 Statutes, may result in an investigation of such violation. The 226 premature release of such information could frustrate or thwart 227 the investigation and impair the ability of the department to 228 effectively and efficiently administer s. 501.9985, Florida 229 Statutes. In addition, release of such information before 230 completion of an active investigation could jeopardize the 231 ongoing investigation. 232 (2)âThe release of information that is otherwise 233 confidential or exempt from public records requirements once an 234 investigation is completed or ceases to be active would undo the 235 specific statutory exemption protecting that information, thus 236 affirming that any protections currently afforded to such 237 information are not removed. 238 (3)âAn investigation of a violation of s. 501.9985, Florida 239 Statutes, is likely to result in the gathering of sensitive 240 personal identifying information, which could include 241 identification numbers, unique identifiers, professional or 242 employment-related information, and personal financial 243 information. Such information could be used for the purpose of 244 identity theft. The release of such information could subject 245 families to possible privacy violations, as it would reveal 246 information of a sensitive personal nature. 247 (4)âNotices received by the department and information 248 generated during an investigation of a violation of s. 501.9985, 249 Florida Statutes, are likely to contain proprietary information. 250 Such information derives independent economic value, actual or 251 potential, from being generally unknown to, and not readily 252 ascertainable by, other persons who might obtain economic value 253 from its disclosure or use. Allowing public access to 254 proprietary information through a public records request could 255 destroy the value of the proprietary information and cause a 256 financial loss to the operator of a bot. Release of such 257 information could give business competitors an unfair advantage. 258 (5)âInformation held by the department may contain a 259 computer forensic report or information that could reveal 260 weaknesses in the data security of an operator of a bot. The 261 release of this information could result in the identification 262 of vulnerabilities in the cybersecurity system of the operator 263 of a bot and be used to harm the operator of the bot and its 264 clients. 265 (6)âThe harm that may result from the release of 266 information held by the department pursuant to a notification or 267 an investigation of a violation of s. 501.9985, Florida 268 Statutes, could impair the effective and efficient 269 administration of the investigation and thus outweighs the 270 public benefit that may be derived from the disclosure of the 271 information. 272 Section 5.âPresent subsection (6) of section 501.9986, 273 Florida Statutes, as created by SB 482 or similar legislation, 274 2026 Regular Session, is redesignated as subsection (7), and a 275 new subsection (6) is added to that section, to read: 276 501.9986âConsumer protections regarding deidentified data.â 277 (6)(a)âAll information held by the department pursuant to a 278 notification of a violation of this section or an investigation 279 of a violation of this section is confidential and exempt from 280 s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution, 281 until such time as the investigation is completed or ceases to 282 be active. This exemption shall be construed in conformity with 283 s. 119.071(2)(c). 284 (b)âDuring an active investigation, information made 285 confidential and exempt pursuant to paragraph (a) may be 286 disclosed by the department: 287 1.âIn the furtherance of its official duties and 288 responsibilities; 289 2.âFor print, publication, or broadcast if the department 290 determines that such release would assist in notifying the 291 public or locating or identifying a person whom the department 292 believes to be a victim of an improper use or disposal of 293 customer records, except that information made confidential and 294 exempt by paragraph (c) may not be released pursuant to this 295 subparagraph; or 296 3.âTo another governmental entity in the furtherance of 297 such entityâs official duties and responsibilities. 298 (c)âUpon completion of an investigation or once an 299 investigation ceases to be active, the following information 300 held by the department shall remain confidential and exempt from 301 s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution: 302 1.âInformation that is otherwise confidential or exempt 303 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 304 Constitution. 305 2.âPersonal identifying information. 306 3.âA computer forensic report. 307 4.âInformation that would otherwise reveal weaknesses in 308 the data security of an artificial intelligence technology 309 company. 310 5.âInformation that would disclose the proprietary 311 information of an artificial intelligence technology company. 312 (d)âFor purposes of this section, the term âproprietary 313 informationâ means information that: 314 1.âIs owned or controlled by the artificial intelligence 315 technology company. 316 2.âIs intended to be private and is treated by the 317 artificial intelligence technology company as private because 318 disclosure would harm the artificial intelligence technology 319 company or its business operations. 320 3.âHas not been disclosed except as required by law or a 321 private agreement that provides that the information will not be 322 released to the public. 323 4.âIs not publicly available or otherwise readily 324 ascertainable through proper means from another source in the 325 same configuration as received by the department. 326 5.âReveals competitive interests, the disclosure of which 327 would impair the competitive advantage of the artificial 328 intelligence technology company that is the subject of the 329 information. 330 (e)âThis subsection is subject to the Open Government 331 Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand 332 repealed on October 2, 2031, unless reviewed and saved from 333 repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 334 Section 6.âThe Legislature finds that it is a public 335 necessity that all information held by the Department of Legal 336 Affairs pursuant to a notification of a violation of s. 337 501.9986, Florida Statutes, or an investigation of a violation 338 of that section, be made confidential and exempt from s. 339 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of the 340 State Constitution for the following reasons: 341 (1)âA notification of a violation of s. 501.9986, Florida 342 Statutes, may result in an investigation of such violation. The 343 premature release of such information could frustrate or thwart 344 the investigation and impair the ability of the department to 345 effectively and efficiently administer s. 501.9986, Florida 346 Statutes. In addition, release of such information before 347 completion of an active investigation could jeopardize the 348 ongoing investigation. 349 (2)âThe release of information that is otherwise 350 confidential or exempt from public records requirements once an 351 investigation is completed or ceases to be active would undo the 352 specific statutory exemption protecting that information, thus 353 affirming that any protections currently afforded to such 354 information are not removed. 355 (3)âAn investigation of a violation of s. 501.9986, Florida 356 Statutes, is likely to result in the gathering of sensitive 357 personal identifying information, which could include 358 identification numbers, unique identifiers, professional or 359 employment-related information, and personal financial 360 information. Such information could be used for the purpose of 361 identity theft. The release of such information could subject 362 families to possible privacy violations, as it would reveal 363 information of a sensitive personal nature. 364 (4)âNotices received by the department and information 365 generated during an investigation of a violation of s. 501.9986, 366 Florida Statutes, are likely to contain proprietary information. 367 Such information derives independent economic value, actual or 368 potential, from being generally unknown to, and not readily 369 ascertainable by, other persons who might obtain economic value 370 from its disclosure or use. Allowing public access to 371 proprietary information through a public records request could 372 destroy the value of the proprietary information and cause a 373 financial loss to the artificial intelligence technology 374 company. Release of such information could give business 375 competitors an unfair advantage. 376 (5)âInformation held by the department may contain a 377 computer forensic report or information that could reveal 378 weaknesses in the data security of an artificial intelligence 379 technology company. The release of this information could result 380 in the identification of vulnerabilities in the cybersecurity 381 system of the artificial intelligence technology company and be 382 used to harm the artificial intelligence technology company and 383 its clients. 384 (6)âThe harm that may result from the release of 385 information held by the department pursuant to a notification or 386 an investigation of a violation of s. 501.9986, Florida 387 Statutes, could impair the effective and efficient 388 administration of the investigation and thus outweighs the 389 public benefit that may be derived from the disclosure of the 390 information. 391 Section 7.âThis act shall take effect on the same date that 392 SB 482 or similar legislation takes effect, if such legislation 393 is adopted in the same legislative session or an extension 394 thereof and becomes a law.